Massachusetts, session 194th, H1385.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Paragraph (n 1/2) of section 5 of chapter 614 of the acts of 1968, as inserted
by chapter 288 of the acts of 2010, is hereby amended by striking out the words “community
hospitals” and inserting in place thereof the following:- “acute care hospitals”.
SECTION 2. Subsection (g) of section 10 of chapter 614 of the acts of 1968, as inserted
by section 21 of chapter 9 of the acts of 2011, is hereby amended by striking out the words
“community hospital” in each instance in which they appear, and inserting in place thereof the
following:- “acute care hospital”.
SECTION 3. Subsection (g) of section 10 of chapter 614 of the acts of 1968, as inserted
by section 21 of chapter 9 of the acts of 2011, is hereby amended by striking out the words
“community hospitals” in each instance in which they appear, and inserting in place thereof the
following:-- “acute care hospitals”.
of 2

SECTION 4. Subsection (g) of section 10 of chapter 614 of the acts of 1968, as inserted
by section 21 of chapter 9 of the acts of 2011, is hereby amended by striking paragraph (12) in its
entirety.
of 2